Hawaii, session 2026, HB2046.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter ʻŌlelo Hawaiʻi Commission §   -1  Definitions.  For the purposes of this chapter: "Commission" means the ʻŌlelo Hawaiʻi commission. "ʻŌlelo Hawaiʻi" means the indigenous language of Hawaiʻi and one of the official languages of the State. §   -2  ʻŌlelo Hawaiʻi commission; established.  There shall be established the ʻŌlelo Hawaiʻi commission within the office of the governor on a temporary basis for administrative and certain other special purposes. §   -3  ʻŌlelo Hawaiʻi commission; membership.  (a)  The commission shall comprise of the following members: (1)  The chief executive officer of the office of Hawaiian affairs or the officer's designee, who shall serve as chair of the commission; (2)  A representative from the office of Hawaiian education of the department of education; (3)  A representative from the Kawaihuelani center for Hawaiian language at the university of Hawaiʻi at Mānoa; and (4)  A representative from the Ka Haka ʻUla O Keʻelikōlani college of Hawaiian language at the university of Hawaiʻi at Hilo. (b)  The following members shall be selected by the chair and invited to participate: (1)  A native speaker of the Niihau dialect; (2)  A representative from the Hawaiian Language Lexicon Committee; and (3)  Other subject matter stakeholders as determined by the chair. §   -4  Powers and duties of the commission.  The commission shall: (1)  Coordinate efforts by the State, office of the governor, and counties, to promote the teaching and learning of ʻŌlelo Hawaiʻi; (2)  Encourage the speaking of ʻŌlelo Hawaiʻi through regular campaigns, activities, and educational resources; (3)  Support private and public organizations in developing and evaluating their own ʻŌlelo Hawaiʻi language plans; (4)  Conduct and commission research to support the revitalization of ʻŌlelo Hawaiʻi; and (5)  Ensure that ʻŌlelo Hawaiʻi remains a living language by developing new words that reflect changing social and cultural norms and contemporary language usage. §   -5  Annual report.  The commission shall submit an annual report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session. The report shall include: (1)  A description of the activities conducted by the commission; and (2)  Any relevant data regarding the impact of the commission's activities on the preservation and growth of ʻŌlelo Hawaiʻi usage." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment and operation of the ʻŌlelo Hawaiʻi commission. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the office of the governor for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000, and shall be repealed on December 2, 2030.